District of Columbia statutes.
22-302

Burning one’s own property with intent to defraud or injure another.

Whoever maliciously burns or sets fire to any dwelling, shop, barn, stable, store, or warehouse or other building, or any steamboat, vessel, canal boat, or other watercraft, or any goods, wares, or merchandise, the same being his own property, in whole or in part, with intent to defraud or injure any other person, shall be imprisoned for not more than 15 years. In addition to any other penalty provided under this section, a person may be fined an amount not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1323, ch. 854, § 821
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 303(k), 60 DCR 2064
Fraud, see § 22-3221.
Murder in the first degree, description, see § 22-2101.
This section is referenced in § 22-2101, § 23-546, and § 24-112.
1981 Ed., § 22-402.
1973 Ed., § 22-402.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 added the last sentence.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 303(k) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.